Washington statutes.
RCW 43.235.060

Data collection and analysis.

Within available funds, data regarding each domestic violence fatality review shall be collected on standard forms created by the coordinating entity. Data collected on reviewed fatalities shall be compiled and analyzed for the purposes of identifying points at which the system response to domestic violence could be improved and identifying patterns in domestic violence fatalities.

[ 2000 c 50 s 6.]